South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4702.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 4 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 4-9-197. (A) Any county is authorized to provide by ordinance that the owner of any lot or property in the county shall keep such lot or property clean and free of rubbish, debris, and other unhealthy and unsightly material or conditions which constitute a public nuisance. (B) The county may provide by ordinance for notification to the owner of conditions needing correction, may require that the owner take such action as is necessary to correct the conditions, may provide the terms and conditions under which employees of the county or any person employed for that purpose may go upon the property to correct the conditions, and may provide that the cost of such shall become a lien upon the real estate and shall be collectable in the same manner as county taxes, except the provisions of Chapter 51, Title 12 or any other provision of law authorizing a forced sale. The cost of correcting the conditions may not exceed the actual costs to the county. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----